Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1826.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(b) and (c) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are amended to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(b) The term "employer" includes the Commonwealth or any political subdivision or board, department, commission or school 123456789101112131415161718192021 district thereof and any person employing [four] two or more [persons] individuals within [the] this Commonwealth, but except as hereinafter provided, does not include religious, fraternal, charitable or sectarian corporations or associations, except such corporations or associations supported, in whole or in part, by governmental appropriations. The term "employer" with respect to discriminatory practices based on race, color, age, sex, national origin or non-job related handicap or disability, includes religious, fraternal, charitable and sectarian corporations and associations employing [four] two or more [persons] individuals within [the] this Commonwealth.(c) The term "employe" [does not include (1) any individual employed in agriculture or in the domestic service of any person, (2) any individuals who, as a part of their employment, reside in the personal residence of the employer, (3) any individual employed by said individual's parents, spouse or child.] means an individual subject to an employer's power to control the nature and parameters of the individual's activities, including hiring, firing, training, scheduling, directing work and prescribing the manner in which the work should be completed. The term does not include:(1) An individual who is working on a casual basis in a home or personal residence of an employer performing domestic services and is not also employed by a third party. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "casual basis" means only occasionally, at comparatively long and irregular intervals, for limited and temporary purposes, with the hiring in each instance being a matter of special engagement.(2) An individual employed by the individual's parent, spouse or child.20250HB1826PN2250 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1826PN2250 - 3 - 12